Utah statutes.
17D-2-105.   Action of a local entity's governing body or a local building authority's board of directors.

(1)  The governing body of a local entity or the authority board of a local building authority may take an action or proceeding under this chapter by resolution.

(2)  Except as specifically required under this chapter:

(a)  an ordinance, resolution, or proceeding with respect to a transaction under this chapter is not necessary; and

(b)  the publication of a resolution, proceeding, or notice relating to a transaction under this chapter is not necessary.

(3)  The governing body of a local entity or authority board of a local building authority may adopt a proceeding under this chapter on a single reading at a legally convened meeting of the governing body or authority board, as the case may be.

(4)  Except as specifically provided in this chapter, a resolution adopted or proceeding taken under this chapter is not subject to referendum.



Enacted by Chapter 360, 2008 General Session

